North Dakota, session 69, HB1506.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 15 of section 57-40.3-04 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
15. A motor vehicle acquired at any location within this state by an individual who is an
enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian tribe residing within the boundaries
of any reservation or Indian service area in this state, provided the exemption in this
subsection does not apply to a motor vehicle purchased by an individual whose
primary residence is not within the boundaries of any reservation or Indian service
area in this state.
SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act is effective for taxable events occurring after
June 30, 2025.
Page No. 1 25.1240.01000